Hawaii statutes.
§51-2 Provision relating to purchase.
Any franchise heretofore granted by the legislature authorizing the
transportation of persons or property, or both, by motor vehicle limited to one
county or a portion of a county is amended as follows with respect to the
procedure for the purchase of the property of the company holding the franchise
(hereinafter called the "company"):

(1) The legislative body of the county may by
ordinance authorize or provide for the purchase of the property of the
company. No authorization by referendum nor any legislative act authorizing a
referendum shall be required, and all references to a referendum or legislative
act are deleted from the franchise.

(2) Notice by the county to the company of the
county's intention to acquire the property of the company shall not be
required, and all references to the notice are hereby deleted from the
franchise. [L 1967, c 300, §2; HRS §51-2]

Case Notes

On take-over of HRT system by City and County, see 54 H. 356,
507 P.2d 169; 459 F.2d 551.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next